Utah statutes.
58-37e-12.   Prejudgment attachment and execution on judgments.
(1)  A plaintiff under this chapter, subject to Subsection (3), may request an
ex parte prejudgment writ of attachment from the court pursuant to Utah Rules
of Civil Procedure, Rule 64A against all assets of a defendant sufficient to
satisfy a potential award.  If attachment is instituted, a defendant is
entitled to an immediate hearing.  Attachment may be lifted if the defendant
demonstrates that the assets will be available for a potential award or if the
defendant posts a bond sufficient to cover a potential award.
(2)  A person against whom a judgment has been rendered under this chapter is
not eligible to exempt any property, of whatever kind, from process to levy or
process to execute on the judgment, unless the property is exempt by operation
of law.
(3)  Any assets sought to satisfy a judgment under this chapter that are named
in a forfeiture action or have been seized for forfeiture by any state or
federal agency may not be used to satisfy a judgment unless and until the
assets have been released following the conclusion of the forfeiture action or
released by the agency that seized the assets.
